Arkansas, session 2025, SB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-22-804(a)(7), concerning the duties of
the Arkansas Fire Protection Services Board, is amended to read as follows:
(7) Provide oversight for Advise the Director of the Arkansas
Fire Training Academy in matters related to the:
(i) Training and certification of fire services personnel
in Arkansas; and
(ii) Curriculum and instructional content of the
curriculum offered by the Arkansas Fire Training Academy;



*JLL293*
03/17/2025 11:44:31 AM JLL293